Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-238
Raptor, defined.

Raptor means any bird of the Accipitriformes, Falconiformes, or Strigiformes, including, but not limited to, caracaras,
eagles, falcons, harriers, hawks, kites, osprey, owls, and vultures.

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 48;

Laws 2011, LB41, § 1.